Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska58-832
Authority; mortgage of certain property.

The authority may mortgage all or any portion of any project or any other facilities conveyed to the authority for such purpose and the site or sites thereof, whether presently owned or subsequently acquired, for the benefit of the holders of the bonds of the authority issued to finance such project or any portion thereof or issued to refund or refinance outstanding indebtedness or to reimburse an endowment or any similar fund of an eligible institution as permitted by the Nebraska Educational, Health, Cultural, and Social Services Finance Authority Act.

Laws 1981, LB 321, § 29;

Laws 1993, LB 465, § 14;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-2929;

Laws 1995, LB 5, § 29;

R.S.1943, (2008), § 85-1729;

Laws 2013, LB170, § 32;

Laws 2019, LB224, § 16.